Mississippi, session 2026, SB2639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For the purpose of this section: (a) "Crawfish" means freshwater crustaceans of genera Cambarus or Astacus; and (b)  "Crawfish farming" means the raising, harvesting and production of crawfish, from eggs to food size, in a controlled, privately owned environment. (2)  Any person who wishes to engage in the farming of crawfish in privately owned waters or ponds, must apply to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce for a crawfish farming license. (3)  The Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to establish, oversee and regulate the crawfish farming license required in subsection (2) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.